Massachusetts, session 194th, H4717.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of Article 12 of Annual Town Meeting May 
7, 2007, and Chapter 56 of the Acts of 2008, the Annual Meeting for the Town of Orange shall 
be held on the Second Monday in May.  
SECTION 2. This Act shall take effect upon its passage.